Hawaii statutes.
[§30-4] Duties of outgoing governor.
It shall be incumbent upon the outgoing governor to:

(1) Provide channels enabling the governor-elect to:

(A) Inform career civil servants of
governor-elect's program goals and new policies;

(B) Effect communication channels with the
administration of the governor. The governor-elect may obtain information from
the governor's administration by circulating questionnaires or by other means.
Information sought may include any questions which will effect the intent of
the legislature in enacting this legislation, as expressed in section 30-1.
Such contacts may also include inquiries designed to elicit descriptions of
programs, recommendations, and justifications for elimination, curtailment, or
expansion of services, projections of future developments or needs within
program areas, recommendations for administrative changes, comments upon
anticipated federal developments which might have program or budgetary
implications for state programs, and elaboration of procedural details.

(2) Direct that official documents, vital
information, and procedural manuals be given to the governor-elect upon the
governor-elect's request. [L 1972, c 126, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next